Washington statutes.
RCW 15.76.110

Definitions.

(1) "Agricultural fair" means a fair or exhibition which is intended to promote agriculture and support rural economic development by including a balanced variety of exhibits of livestock and agricultural products, as well as related arts and manufactures; including products of the farm home and educational contests, displays, and demonstrations designed to train youth and to promote the welfare of farm people and rural living.

(2) "Department" means the state department of agriculture.

(3) "Director" means the director of agriculture.

(4) "Commission" means the fairs commission created by this chapter.

(5) "State allocations" means allocations from the state fair fund.

[ 2018 c 280 s 2; 2012 c 221 s 2; 1961 c 61 s 2.]